Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 4 Wage and Hour Regulation Generally
11-4-211. Overtime.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and §§ 11-4-210 and 11-4-212, no employer shall employ any of his or her employees for a work week longer than forty (40) hours unless the employee receives compensation for his or her employment in excess of the hours above specified at a rate not less than one and one-half (1 ½) times the regular rate of pay at which he or she is employed.

The provisions regarding the payment of wages at one and one-half (1 ½) times the regular rate of pay for overtime services shall not be applicable with respect to agricultural employees.

Neither the provisions of this section nor the provisions of any other law of this state shall be construed to require the payment of compensation at a greater rate than the normal rate for services performed by agricultural employees in excess of forty (40) hours per week.

This section shall not apply to any employee exempt from the overtime requirements of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act pursuant to the provisions of 29 U.S.C. § 213(b)(1)-(24) and (b)(28)-(30), as they existed on March 1, 2006.

No public agency shall be deemed to have violated this section with respect to the employment of any employee in fire protection activities or law enforcement activities, including security personnel in correctional institutions, provided that the public agency pays overtime pay in compliance with 29 U.S.C. § 207(k), as it existed on March 1, 2006.

In lieu of overtime compensation, the State of Arkansas and any political subdivision of the state may award compensatory time off at a rate of not less than one and one-half (1 ½) hours for each hour of employment for which overtime compensation is required. The compensatory time off may be provided only:

Pursuant to applicable provisions of a collective bargaining agreement, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement between the public agency and representatives of such employees.

In the case of employees not covered by subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section, an agreement or understanding arrived at between the employer and employee before the performance of the work; and

If the employee has not terminated employment and has not accrued compensatory time in excess of the following:

Four hundred eighty (480) hours for police, firefighters, emergency response personnel, and employees engaged in seasonal activities; or

Two hundred forty (240) hours for any public employee not otherwise exempt or covered by subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this section.

By rule, the Director of the Division of Labor may authorize employment in excess of the standard set by subsection (a) of this section or may authorize the calculation of overtime on a basis other than the regular rate of pay required by subsection (a) of this section for employment:

Necessitating irregular hours of work;

At a piece rate;

Paying on a commission basis in a retail or service establishment;

In a hospital or enterprise engaged in the care of the sick, the aged, or individuals with mental illness;

By an independently-owned-and-controlled local enterprise engaged in the wholesale or bulk distribution of petroleum products; and

Under a collective bargaining agreement.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 3; 1977, No. 345, §§ 4, 5; 1983, No. 453, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-321, 81-321.1; Acts 1991, No. 544, § 2; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 4; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 4; 2007, No. 545, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 761; 2019, No. 910, § 5312.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in the introductory language of (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language of (g).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8, provide: “This act shall become effective on October 1, 2006.”

11-4-212. Allowance for gratuities.

Every employer of an employee engaged in any occupation in which gratuities have been customarily and usually constituted and have been recognized as a part of remuneration for hiring purposes shall be entitled to an allowance for gratuities as a part of the hourly wage rate provided in § 11-4-210 in an amount of no less than three dollars and sixty-two cents ($3.62) per hour, provided that the employee actually received that amount in gratuities and that the application of the foregoing gratuity allowances results in payment of wages other than gratuities to tipped employees, including full-time students subject to the provisions of § 11-4-210, of no less than two dollars and sixty-three cents ($2.63) per hour.

In determining whether an employee received in gratuities the amount claimed, the Director of the Division of Labor may require the employee to show to the satisfaction of the director that the actual amount of gratuities received by him or her during any work week was less than the amount determined by the employer as the amount by which the wage paid the employee was deemed to be increased under this section.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 3; 1973, No. 13, § 1; 1975, No. 316, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1156, § 1; 1977, No. 345, § 3; 1979, No. 996, § 4; 1981, No. 610, § 1; 1981, No. 667, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-321; reen. Acts 1987, No. 987, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 7; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 7; 2007, No. 707, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5313.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b).

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 987, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8, provide: “This act shall become effective on October 1, 2006.”

11-4-213. Allowance for furnishing board, lodging, apparel, etc.

An employer of an employee engaged in an occupation in which board, lodging, apparel, or other items and services are customarily and regularly furnished to the employee for his or her benefit is entitled to an allowance for the reasonable value of board, lodging, apparel, or other items and services as part of the hourly wage rate provided in § 11-4-210 in an amount not to exceed the fair and reasonable cost of the board, lodging, apparel, or other items and services.

The determination of reasonable cost of the board, lodging, apparel, or other items and services shall be based on 29 U.S.C. § 203(m), as it existed on January 1, 2019, and 29 C.F.R. § 531.1 et seq.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 3; 1973, No. 13, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-321; Acts 2019, No. 853, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5314.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 853, supersedes the amendment by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5314, which substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b).

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 853 substituted “the fair and reasonable cost of the board, lodging, apparel, or other items and services” for “thirty cents (30¢) per hour” in (a); rewrote (b); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b).

11-4-214. Temporary special exemptions — Definition.

Any person handicapped by lack of skill, age, or physical or mental deficiency or injury in any way that his or her earning capacity is impaired shall be granted a temporary special exemption license or permit authorizing the employment of the person at wages lower than the minimum prescribed in this subchapter until such time as the Director of the Division of Labor shall hold a hearing and prescribe rules regarding exemption of these persons as authorized in this section.

The director may provide by rule, after notice and public hearing at which any person may be heard, for the employment in any occupation of individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency or injury at wages lower than the minimum wage rate provided in § 11-4-210 as he or she may find appropriate to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment, to avoid undue hardship, and to safeguard the minimum wage rate under this subchapter.

In addition, the director, by rule or special order, may provide for the employment of handicapped clients in work activities centers under special certificates at wages that are less than the minimum prescribed in § 11-4-210 that the director determines constitutes equitable compensation for the clients in work activities centers.

For the purposes of this section, the term “work activities centers” shall mean centers planned and designed exclusively to provide therapeutic activities for handicapped clients whose physical and mental impairment is so severe as to make their productivity capacities inconsequential.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-324; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 762; 2019, No. 910, § 5315.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” twice in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-4-215. Learners, apprentices, and full-time students.

For any occupation, the Director of the Division of Labor may provide, by rule, after a public hearing at which any person may be heard, for the employment in the occupation of learners, apprentices, and full-time students at wages lower than the minimum wage rate provided in § 11-4-210(b) as he or she may find appropriate to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment and to safeguard the minimum wage rate under this subchapter.

No employee shall be employed at wages fixed pursuant to this section, except under special license issued under applicable rules of the director.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-325; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 763; 2019, No. 910, § 5316.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-4-216. Posting of law.

Every employer subject to any provisions of this subchapter or of any rules issued under this subchapter shall keep a summary of this subchapter, approved by the Director of the Division of Labor, and copies of any applicable rules issued under this subchapter, or a summary of the rules approved by the director, posted in a conspicuous and accessible place in or about the premises wherein any person subject thereto is employed.

Employers shall be furnished copies of the summaries of this statute and rules by the director on request without charge.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-327; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 764; 2019, No. 910, § 5317.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-4-217. Records kept by employer.

Every employer subject to any provision of this subchapter or of any rule issued under this subchapter shall make and keep for a period of not less than three (3) years in or about the premises wherein any employee is employed a record of the name, address, and occupation of each of his or her employees, the rate of pay, the amount paid each pay period to each employee, and such other information as the Director of the Division of Labor shall prescribe by rule as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter or of the rules under this subchapter.

The records shall be open for inspection or transcription by the director or his or her authorized representative at any reasonable time.

Every employer shall furnish to the director or to his or her authorized representative on demand a sworn statement of the records and information upon forms prescribed or approved by the director.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-326; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 765; 2019, No. 910, § 5318.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315, in (a), substituted “rule” for “regulation” twice and substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-4-218. Employee's remedies.

Any employer who pays any employee less than the minimum wages, including overtime compensation or compensatory time off as provided by this subchapter, to which the employee is entitled under or by virtue of this subchapter shall:

Pay any applicable civil penalties; and

Be liable to the employee affected for:

The full amount of the wages, less any amount actually paid to the employee by the employer; and

Costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court.

The employee may be awarded an additional amount up to, but not greater than, the amount under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section to be paid as liquidated damages if the employee proves the violation was willful.

Any agreement between the employee and employer to work for less than minimum wages shall be no defense to the action.

The venue of the action shall lie in the circuit court of any county in which the services that are the subject of the employment were performed.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall have the authority to fully enforce this subchapter by instituting legal action to recover any wages that he or she determines to be due to employees under this subchapter.

No legal action shall be brought by the director until after notice and opportunity for hearing pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and entry of a final administrative order.

Following any appeals taken pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., the director shall be entitled to enforce his or her final administrative order in any court of competent jurisdiction without paying costs or giving bond for costs.

The director's findings of fact shall be conclusive in any such proceeding.

An employee may bring an action for equitable and monetary relief against an employer, including the State of Arkansas or a political subdivision of the state, if the employer pays the employee less than the minimum wages, including overtime wages, to which the employee is entitled under or by virtue of this subchapter.

If the employee brings an action under this subsection, then any complaint before the director by the employee on the same matter shall be dismissed with respect to that employee.

The employee shall not be required to exhaust administrative remedies before bringing an action.

There shall be no procedural, pleading, or burden of proof requirements beyond those that apply generally to civil suits in order to maintain the action.

An employee shall not become a party plaintiff to an action under subdivision (e)(1) of this section unless he or she gives consent in writing to become a party to the action and files the consent in the court in which the action is brought.

When construing this subchapter, a court may look for guidance to state and federal decisions interpreting the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended and codified in 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2017, which decisions and act shall have persuasive authority only.

The statute of limitations for causes of action under this subchapter is two (2) years.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 12; 1971, No. 731, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-330; Acts 1997, No. 221, § 1; 1999, No. 981, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 5; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 5; 2017, No. 914, § 3; 2019, No. 853, §§ 3-5; 2019, No. 910, § 5319.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 914, § 1, provided: “Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to resolve questions that have arisen regarding:

“(1)

The proper interpretation of § 11-4-205 and § 11-4-218(b); and

“(2)

What activities constitute ‘work’ under the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, § 11-4-201 et seq., as interpreted by the Supreme Court in Gerber Products Company v. Hewitt, 2016 Ark. 222, 492 S.W.3d 856.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 853 added “if the employee proves the violation was willful” in (a)(2); and added (e)(4) and (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (d)(1).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8, provide: “This act shall become effective on October 1, 2006.”

11-4-219. Judicial review.

Any interested person in any occupation for which any administrative rule has been issued under the provisions of this subchapter who may be aggrieved by any rule may obtain a review thereof in the circuit court of the county of the residence of the aggrieved party by filing in the court within twenty (20) days after the date of publication of the rule a written petition praying that the rule be modified or set aside.

A copy of the petition shall be served upon the Director of the Division of Labor.

The court shall review the record of the proceedings before the director, and the director's findings of fact shall be affirmed if supported by substantial evidence. The court shall determine whether the rule is in accordance with law.

If the court determines that the rule is not in accordance with law, it shall remand the case to the director with directions to modify or revoke the rule.

If application is made to the court for leave to adduce additional evidence by any aggrieved party, the party shall show to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to adduce the evidence before the director.

If the court finds that the evidence is material and that reasonable grounds exist for failure of the aggrieved party to adduce the evidence in prior proceedings, the court shall remand the case to the director with directions that the additional evidence be taken before the director.

The director may modify his or her findings and conclusions, in whole or in part, by reason of the additional evidence.

Hearings in the circuit court on all appeals taken under the provisions of this subchapter shall take precedence over all matters except matters of the same character. The jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive, and its judgment and decree shall be final, except that it shall be subject to review by the Supreme Court.

The commencement of proceedings under subsections (a)-(d) of this section, unless specifically ordered by the court, shall not operate as a stay of an administrative rule issued under the provisions of this subchapter.

The court shall not grant any stay of an administrative rule unless the person complaining of the rule shall file an amount in the court, undertaking with a surety satisfactory to the court, for payment to the employees affected by the rule in the event that the rule is affirmed. The surety shall be in an amount by which the compensation the employees are entitled to receive under the rule exceeds the compensation they actually receive while the stay is in effect.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-328; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 10; 2019, No. 315, §§ 766-768; 2019, No. 910, § 5320.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” throughout (a), (c), and (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b).

11-4-220. Person entitled to file a claim.

Any employee covered by this subchapter may file a claim with the Director of the Division of Labor charging that an employer has violated § 11-4-210 or § 11-4-211 as to any employee or other person.

The director shall promptly investigate each claim.

The name of any employee identified in a claim shall be kept confidential until the director issues an administrative complaint or the director is ordered to release the information by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 6; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5321.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8, provide: “This act shall become effective on October 1, 2006.”

11-4-221. Relief from liability under this subchapter for failure to pay minimum wage or overtime compensation.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an employer is not subject to liability under this subchapter, on account of the failure of the employer to pay an employee minimum wages or to pay an employee overtime compensation, for or on account of any of the following activities of the employee:

Walking, riding, or traveling to and from the actual place of performance of the principal activity or activities which the employee is employed to perform; and

An activity that is preliminary to or postliminary to the principal activity or activities, which occurs either before the time on any particular workday at which the employee commences or subsequent to the time on any particular workday at which he or she ceases the principal activity or activities.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, the use of an employer's vehicle for travel by an employee and activities performed by an employee that are incidental to the use of the vehicle for commuting shall not be considered part of the employee's principal activities if the use of the vehicle for travel is within the normal commuting area for the employer's business or establishment and the use of the employer's vehicle is subject to an agreement on the part of the employer and the employee or representative of the employee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section that relieve an employer from liability and punishment with respect to any activity, the employer is not relieved from liability if the activity is compensable by either:

An express provision of a written or oral contract in effect at the time of the activity between the employee, his or her agent, or collective-bargaining representative and his or her employer; or

A custom or practice in effect at the time of the activity at the establishment or other place where the employee is employed covering the activity, not inconsistent with a written or oral contract in effect at the time of the activity, between the employee, his or her agent, or collective-bargaining representative and his or her employer.

For the purposes of subsection (b) of this section, an activity shall be considered as compensable under a contract provision or a custom or practice only when the activity is engaged in during the portion of the day with respect to which it is compensable.

In the application of the minimum wage and overtime compensation provisions of this subchapter, in determining the time for which an employer employs an employee with respect to walking, riding, traveling, or other preliminary or postliminary activities described in subsection (a) of this section, the time, but only that time, during which the employee engages in any activity which is compensable within the meaning of subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be counted.

This section applies only to conduct occurring on or after April 5, 2017.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 914, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 914, § 1, provided: “Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to resolve questions that have arisen regarding:

“(1)

The proper interpretation of § 11-4-205 and § 11-4-218(b); and

“(2)

What activities constitute ‘work’ under the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, § 11-4-201 et seq., as interpreted by the Supreme Court in Gerber Products Company v. Hewitt, 2016 Ark. 222, 492 S.W.3d 856.”

11-4-222. Political subdivisions prohibited from requiring more than federal or state requirements from employers — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Employee” means an individual employed in this state by an employer;

“Employer” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity that does business in this state.

However, “employer” does not include a public employer;

“Employment benefit” means anything of value that an employee may receive from an employer in addition to wages and salary, including without limitation:

Health, disability, retirement, profit-sharing, and death benefits;

Group accidental death and dismemberment benefits;

Paid or unpaid days off from work for holidays, sick leave, vacation, and personal necessity; and

Terms of employment, notice of scheduling, attendance, or leave policies;

“Political subdivision” means a county, city, or town in this state; and

“Public employer” means the State of Arkansas and each political subdivision of the state.

A political subdivision shall not establish, mandate, or otherwise require an employer to provide to an employee a minimum or living wage rate or employment benefit that exceeds the requirements of federal laws or regulations or state laws or rules.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 643, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 643, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)(A)

Arkansas employers are best able to grow and invest in their communities when operating under a clear, consistent regulatory system that imposes only those burdens absolutely necessary to promote the public welfare.

“(B)

Allowing localities to mandate employer-provided benefits would create a patchwork of local regulations discouraging employers from growing and investing and imposing significant compliance burdens on them; and

“(C)

Furthermore, locally mandated benefits frustrate the General Assembly's goal of a thriving statewide economy and place Arkansas employers at a competitive disadvantage to employers in other states not burdened with unnecessary local regulations; and

“(2)

Preemption of burdensome and unnecessary local government mandates on employers to provide employee benefits provides a stable environment for Arkansas employers and promotes economic development.”

Acts 2017, No. 643, § 3, provided: “Applicability. Section 2 of this act does not preempt any state law or local minimum wage ordinance requirements in effect on the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017].”

Subchapter 3
— Wage Disputes

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 147, § 2: Feb. 19, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public interest demands that wage earners in the State be given effective legal remedies and recourse to be able to recover hard earned wages. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety and welfare, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-4-301. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “labor” means work or service performed by a person employed for a period of time for which the wages or salary or remuneration for the work or services is to be paid at stated intervals or at the termination of the employment or for physical work actually performed by an independent contractor if the amount in controversy does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

History.

Acts 1937, No. 86, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8537; Acts 1941, No. 431, § 1; 1973, No. 147, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-311; Acts 2009, No. 622, § 1.

11-4-302. Act cumulative.

This subchapter is a substitute for Acts 1923, No. 380, but apart from that act is cumulative in its effect and shall not be so construed as to nullify or repeal the laws now existing with regard to liens.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 86, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 8541; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-315.

11-4-303. Director of Division of Labor to conduct hearing.

Upon application of either employer or employee, the Director of the Division of Labor or any person authorized by the director shall have authority to inquire into, hear, and decide disputes arising from wages earned and shall allow or reject any deduction from wages.

Upon motion of either employer or employee, the amount found to be due may be paid in the presence of the director or person designated by him or her, and after final hearing by the director or person appointed by him or her, he or she shall file in the office of the Division of Labor a copy of findings and facts and his or her award.

The amount of the award of the director shall be presumed to be the amount of wages, if any, due and unpaid to the employee.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 86, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 8538; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-312; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5322.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of Division of Labor” for “Director of Department of Labor” in the section heading; substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b).

11-4-304. Judicial review.

If either employer or employee shall fail or refuse to accept the findings of the Director of the Division of Labor, then either shall have the right to proceed at law as provided.

If the claim is meritorious, and if within the discretion of the director the claimant's lack of financial ability entitles him or her to the services of the Division of Labor, the director in the name of the State of Arkansas, for the benefit of the claimant, may institute action in any court of competent jurisdiction, without paying costs or giving bond for costs, and shall be entitled to all remedies available to litigants in the prosecution of actions and their enforcement, if successful.

Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to relieve an unsuccessful defendant from paying costs.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 86, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 8538; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-312; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5323.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b).

11-4-305. Enforcement of laborer's lien.

In all cases where the claimant is entitled to a laborer's lien or a lien on a thing or property worked on, the lien may be enforced as otherwise provided for by law, except that where a sheriff or constable is authorized to take charge of property subject to a lien claim and hold it subject to the decision of the court, as in cases of attachment, the sheriff or constable, upon the claimant's otherwise complying with the law regarding attachments and upon the claimant's filing an affidavit with the clerk of the court that he or she is unable to make an attachment bond, shall take the defendant's receipt for the property described in the plaintiff's statement as required by § 18-43-106, and the property shall be left in the possession of the defendant.

The defendant shall exercise full dominion over the property as if it had not been attached except that he or she may not give it away. The defendant may sell, pledge, mortgage, or otherwise alienate or encumber the property if the proceeds therefrom bear a reasonable relation to the value of the lien, so that the person purchasing or taking an encumbrance upon the property shall possess superior rights to the lien claimant.

The defendant, however, selling or encumbering the property shall be held accountable to the court for the proceeds of the sale or encumbrance and shall file with the clerk of the court at the time of making the sale, or charging the property with an encumbrance, a statement giving the name of the purchaser or encumbrancer, his or her address, and the amount realized from the sale or encumbrance.

The defendant shall also notify the plaintiff of the filing of the statement.

If, upon the successful termination of the litigation in favor of the lien claimant, the defendant fails within five (5) days to pay into the registry of the court where the action was originally instituted the proceeds from the sale or encumbrance, the defendant shall be held to be in contempt of court and punished as for contempt.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 86, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 8539; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-313.

Cross References.

Laborer's liens, § 18-43-101 et seq.

11-4-306. Fees prohibited.

The Director of the Division of Labor or any person designated by him or her shall not charge or be permitted to accept any fees or remuneration whatsoever from any person for the performance of any duties under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 86, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 8540; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-314; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5324.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”.

Subchapter 4
— Payment of Wages

Effective Dates.

Acts 1889, No. 61, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 172, § 3: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1905, No. 210, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1907, No. 315, § 4: effective 30 days after passage.

Acts 1909, No. 13, § 3: July 1, 1909.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-4-401. Payment semimonthly.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all corporations doing business in this state that employ any salespersons, mechanics, laborers, or other servants for the transaction of business shall pay the wages of the employees no less frequently than semimonthly.

Any corporation that shall, through its president or otherwise, violate subsections (a) and (c) of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

All corporations with an annual gross income of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or more, doing business in this state who shall employ any salespersons, mechanics, laborers, or other servants for the transaction of their business shall pay the wages of their management level and executive employees who are exempt under the provisions of Section 13 of the Fair Labor Standards Act, from the provisions of Sections 6 and 7 of that act, and who are compensated at a gross rate in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year, at a minimum of once each calendar month.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 13, §§ 1, 2, p. 21; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7131, 7132; Pope's Dig., §§ 9117, 9118; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-301, 81-302; Acts 1991, No. 1113, § 1; 2017, No. 475, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “that” for “who shall”, deleted “their” preceding “business”, and inserted “no less frequently than”.

U.S. Code.

Sections 6, 7, and 13 of the Fair Labor Standards Act, referred to in this section, are codified as 29 U.S.C. §§ 206, 207, and 213.

11-4-402. Discount for advance payment — Payments made in currency.

It shall be unlawful for any milling or manufacturing company, or any other person, corporation, or company employing persons to labor for them in the State of Arkansas, to discount the wages of their employees or laborers when payment is made or demanded before the regular paydays more than at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum from the date of payment to the regular payday.

All employees shall be paid in currency or by check or electronic direct deposit into the employee's account.

The employee may opt out of electronic direct deposit by providing the employer a written statement requesting payment by check.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, an employee has a right to be paid in currency if the employer has at any time paid the employee with a check drawn on an account with insufficient funds.

This subsection does not apply to any demand or claim by the Division of Labor.

Any evasion or violation of this section shall be usury and a misdemeanor. The person, company, or corporation, or his, her, or its agents, violating this section shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and the entire property of the person, company, or corporation shall be subject to the payment of the fine and costs.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 172, §§ 1, 2, p. 310; C. & M. Dig., § 7356; Pope's Dig., § 9395; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-303, 81-304; Acts 2003, No. 925, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5325.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (b)(3), deleted the designation “(b)” following “subsection”, and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”.